Hawaii statutes.
[§672E-12] Other actions. This chapter
shall not interfere with a contractor's right to seek contribution, indemnity,
or recovery against a subcontractor, supplier, or design professional for any
claim made against a contractor by a claimant. [L 2004, c 119, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next